District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.33

DC Circulator Fund establishment.

(a)

There is hereby established the DC Circulator Fund as a nonlapsing special fund, the funds of which shall be for the Department to pay for goods, services, property, or for any other authorized purpose, subject to authorization by Congress, into which shall be deposited all revenue collected pursuant to § 50-921.32 by the District, WMATA, or their agents, parking meter revenue from the National Park Service for meters on the Mall, and all monetary gifts intended to be used to assist in the funding of the DC Circulator.

(b)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, during any period of time in which a contract with WMATA is in effect, monies from the payment of fares, the purchase of tickets, and the sale of advertising space by third parties may be, with the written consent of the Chief Financial Officer for the District of Columbia and pursuant to the terms of the contract, deposited in a WMATA interest bearing account for the benefit of the District of Columbia and used by WMATA to offset its costs of contract performance, but only to the extent that Congress has appropriated funds to the District to perform or procure those services; provided, that for a period of 8 months following March 2, 2010, no DC Circulator route shall replace more than 20% of the revenue miles or revenue hours of any WMATA route.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11c
as added Mar. 6, 2007, D.C. Law 16-225, § 3(e), 53 DCR 10232
May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-182, § 2(a), 57 DCR 3404
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9093, 58 DCR 6226
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 6112, 60 DCR 12472
This section is referenced in § 50-921.31.
D.C. Law 18-182, in subsec. (b), substituted “procure those services; provided, that for a period of 8 months following May 27, 2010, no DC Circulator route shall replace more than 20% of the revenue miles or revenue hours of any WMATA route.” for “procure those services.”.
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (a), substituted “lapsing” for “nonlapsing, revolving”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61, in (a), substituted “nonlapsing special fund” for “lapsing special purpose revenue fund” and substituted “or their agents, parking meter revenue from the National Park Service for meters on the Mall” for “or their agents”.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3(d) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-134, June 16, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 5762).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(d) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-321, March 23, 2006, 53 DCR 2557).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 3(e) of District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-3, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1439).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6112 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 6111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle L of Title VI of the act may be cited as the “District Department of Transportation DC Circulator Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.